pl: Klasyfikacja ruchu obrotowego: Duża rotacja; Hiper rotacja; Mała rotacja; Średnia rotacja; Inne
fi: Spinniluokitus: Korkea kierre; Huippukorkea kierre; Matala kierre; Keskikorkea kierre; Muu
pt-BR: Classificação da rotação: Alto giro; Hipergiro; Baixo giro; Médio giro; Outros
hr-HR: Klasifikacija vrtnje: Visoki spin; Hiper spin; Niski spin; Srednji spin; Ostalo
pt-PT: Classificação de rotação: Spin alto; Hiper spin; Spin baixo; Spin médio; Outro
lt-LT: Sukimosi klasifikacija: Didelis sukimasis; Ypač didelis sukimasis; Mažas sukimasis; Vidutinis sukimasis; Kita
ru: Классификация вращения: Высокое вращение; Гипервращение; Низкое вращение; Среднее вращение; Другое
sv: Klassificering för spinn: Mycket spinn; Hyperspinn; Lite spinn; Medelspinn; Annat
th: การจำแนกประเภทการหมุน: สปินสูง; สปินสูงมาก; สปินต่ำ; สปินปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
it: Classificazione dello spin: Spin elevato; Hyper spin; Spin basso; Spin medio; Altro
ja: スピン分類: ハイスピン; ハイパースピン; ロースピン; ミディアムスピン; その他
cs: Klasifikace rotace: Vysoká rotace; Hyper rotace; Nízká rotace; Střední rotace; Jiné
bg-BG: Класификация на спина: Високо въртене; Хипер въртене; Ниско въртене; Средно въртене; Друго
hu: Pörgés besorolása: Magas pörgés; Hiperpörgés; Alacsony pörgés; Közepes pörgés; Egyéb
el: Κατηγοριοποίηση περιστροφής: Υψηλό spin; Υπέρ-spin; Χαμηλό spin; Μεσαίο spin; Άλλο
en: Spin classification: High spin; Hyper spin; Low spin; Medium spin; Other
fr: Classification par spin: Spin élevé; Hyper spin; Spin faible; Spin moyen; Autre
tr: Spin sınıflandırması: Yüksek spin; Hiper spin; Düşük spin; Orta spin; Diğer
zh-TW: 旋轉分類: 高旋轉; 極高旋轉; 低旋轉; 中旋轉; 其他
es: Clasificación de giro: Efecto alto; Híper efecto; Efecto bajo; Efecto medio; Otro
de: Dreheigenschaft: Hoher Spin; Hyper Spin; Niedriger Spin; Mittlerer Spin; Sonstige
nb: Spinn-klassifisering: Høyt spinn; Hyperspinn; Lavt spinn; Middels spinn; Annet
vi: Phân loại độ xoáy: Độ xoáy cao; Độ xoáy siêu cao; Độ xoáy thấp; Độ xoáy trung bình; Khác
zh-CN: 旋转分类: 高旋; 超高旋; 低旋; 中旋; 其他
nl: Spinclassificatie: Hoge spin; Hyper-spin; Lage spin; Gemiddelde spin; Overige
ro-RO: Clasificare a efectului de rotație: Spin ridicat; Hyper spin; Spin redus; Spin mediu; Altele
sl-SI: Klasifikacija vrtenja: Visok spin; Hiper spin; Nizek spin; Srednji spin; Drugo
sk-SK: Klasifikácia vývrtiek: Vysoká rotácia; Hyper rotácia; Nízka rotácia; Stredná rotácia; Iná
da: Spinklassificering: Højt spin; Hyperspin; Lavt spin; Medium spin; Andet
ko: 회전 등급: 하이 스핀; 하이퍼 스핀; 로우 스핀; 미디엄 스핀; 기타